Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1767.01
Bond.

The department shall require each credit union to obtain a fidelity bond, naming the credit union as obligee, in an amount to be determined by the department. The bond shall be issued by an authorized insurer and shall be conditioned to protect and indemnify the credit union from loss which it may sustain of money or other personal property, including that for which the credit union is responsible through or by reason of the fraud, dishonesty, forgery, theft, embezzlement, wrongful abstraction, misapplication, misappropriation, or any other dishonest or criminal act of or by any of its officers, directors, supervisory committee members, credit committee members, or employees. Such bond may contain a deductible clause in an amount to be approved by the director. An executed copy of the bond shall be filed with and approved by the director and shall remain a part of the records of the department. If the premium of the bond is not paid, the bond shall not be canceled or subject to cancellation unless at least ten days' advance notice, in writing, is filed with the department by the insurer. No bond which is current with respect to premium payments shall be canceled or subject to cancellation unless at least forty-five days' advance notice, in writing, is filed with the department by the insurer. The bond shall always be open to public inspection during the office hours of the department. In the event a bond is canceled, the department may take whatever action it deems appropriate in connection with the continued operation of the credit union involved.

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 25.